Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.862

Faculty tenure—Certain grounds constituting sufficient cause.

Sufficient cause shall also include aiding and abetting or participating in: (1) Any unlawful act of violence; (2) any unlawful act resulting in destruction of community or technical college property; or (3) any unlawful interference with the orderly conduct of the educational process.

[ 2015 c 55 s 230; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 40. Formerly RCW 28.85.862.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.